italian.dict
abbinare/ABCGKOSVY1
abbronzare/ABCGKOSVY1
abituare/ABCGKOSVY1
accapezzare/ABCGKOSVY1
accavezzare/ABCGKOSVY1
acciaccare/ABCGKOSVY1
accodare/ABCGKOSVY1
accostumare/ABCGKOSVY1
acquarellare/ABCGKOSVY1
additare/ABCGKOSVY1
aderire/ABCGKOSVY1
affaccendare/ABCGKOSVY1
affiatare/ABCGKOSVY1z
affondare/ABCGKOSVY1
agghindare/ABCGKOSVY1
aggrappare/ABCGKOSVY1
agognare/ABCGKOSVY1
alfabetizzare/ABCGKOSVY1
allettare/ABCGKOSVY1
alluminare/ABCGKOSVY1
amicare/ABCGKOSVY1
ammatassare/ABCGKOSVY1
ammorbidire/ABCGKOSVY1
anagrammare/ABCGKOSVY1
annaffiare/ABCGKOSVY1
annunziare/ABCGKOSVY1
appacificare/ABCGKOSVY1
appezzare/ABCGKOSVY1
appoggiare/ABCGKOSVY1
approvare/ABCGKOSVY1z
archiviare/ABCGKOSVY1
arraffare/ABCGKOSVY1
arrischiare/ABCGKOSVY1
arrubinare/ABCGKOSVY1
aspirare/ABCGKOSVY1
asservire/ABCGKOSVY1
assomigliare/ABCGKOSVY1
attagliare/ABCGKOSVY1
attivizzare/ABCGKOSVY1
attuare/ABCGKOSVY1
autodenominare/ABCGKOSVY1
autoregolare/ABCGKOSVY1
avverare/ABCGKOSVY1
avvittare/ABCGKOSVY1
bacare/ABCGKOSVY1
ballettare/ABCGKOSVY1
barbottare/ABCGKOSVY1
batacchiare/ABCGKOSVY1
belare/ABCGKOSVY1
biffare/ABCGKOSVY1
bisognare/ABCGKOSVY1
boccheggiare/ABCGKOSVY1
borrare/ABCGKOSVY1
brevettare/ABCGKOSVY1
brunire/ABCGKOSVY1
burattare/ABCGKOSVY1
calafatare/ABCGKOSVY1
calzare/ABCGKOSVY1
canterellare/ABCGKOSVY1
capottare/ABCGKOSVY1
carotare/ABCGKOSVY1
categorizzare/ABCGKOSVY1
centellinare/ABCGKOSVY1
chiacchierare/ABCGKOSVY1
cimare/ABCGKOSVY1
civettare/ABCGKOSVY1
coesistere/ABCGKOSVY1
colloquiare/ABCGKOSVY1
commercializzare/ABCGKOSVY1
compiegare/ABCGKOSVY1
computerizzare/ABCGKOSVY1
concretizzare/ABCGKOSVY1
confezionare/ABCGKOSVY1x
conglobare/ABCGKOSVY1
consigliare/ABCGKOSVY1
contingentare/ABCGKOSVY1
contristare/ABCGKOSVY1
convolare/ABCGKOSVY1
corrucciare/ABCGKOSVY1
covare/ABCGKOSVY1
crociare/ABCGKOSVY1
curvare/ABCGKOSVY1z
decalcificare/ABCGKOSVY1
declinare/ABCGKOSVY1
decorticare/ABCGKOSVY1
defiscalizzare/ABCGKOSVY1
degnare/ABCGKOSVY1
demarcare/ABCGKOSVY1
denicotinizzare/ABCGKOSVY1
depoliticizzare/ABCGKOSVY1
derattizzare/ABCGKOSVY1
destabilizzare/ABCGKOSVY1
dettare/ABCGKOSVY1
diffidare/ABCGKOSVY1
dilettare/ABCGKOSVY1
diplomare/ABCGKOSVY1
disambiguare/ABCGKOSVY1
discacciare/ABCGKOSVY1
diserbare/ABCGKOSVY1
disinfettare/ABCGKOSVY1
disonorare/ABCGKOSVY1
dissaldare/ABCGKOSVY1
dissuggellare/ABCGKOSVY1
diventare/ABCGKOSVY1
dominare/ABCGKOSVY1
dubitare/ABCGKOSVY1
effluire/ABCGKOSVY1
eliminare/ABCGKOSVY1
entrare/ABCGKOSVY1
ereditare/ABCGKOSVY1
esborsare/ABCGKOSVY1
esimere/ABCGKOY1
esplorare/ABCGKOSVY1
estradare/ABCGKOSVY1
europeizzare/ABCGKOSVY1
falcare/ABCGKOSVY1
faticare/ABCGKOSVY1
fermentare/ABCGKOSVY1
figurare/ABCGKOSVY1
fiorire/ABCGKOSVY1
fogliare/1ABCGKOSVYa
formicolare/ABCGKOSVY1
frammischiare/ABCGKOSVY1
fregare/ABCGKOSVY1
frugare/ABCGKOSVY1
funzionare/ABCGKOSVY1
gareggiare/ABCGKOSVY1
generare/ABCGKOSVY1
ghigliottinare/ABCGKOSVY1
girare/ABCGKOSVY1
globalizzare/ABCGKOSVY1
gracidare/ABCGKOSVY1
granulare/1ABCGKOSVYa
grondare/ABCGKOSVY1
iarovizzare/ABCGKOSVY1
illividire/ABCGKOSVY1
imbastire/ABCGKOSVY1
imbizzarrire/ABCGKOSVY1
imbracare/ABCGKOSVY1
imbudellare/ABCGKOSVY1
immigrare/ABCGKOSVY1
impalare/ABCGKOSVY1
imparruccare/ABCGKOSVY1
impedantire/ABCGKOSVY1
impestare/ABCGKOSVY1
impigliare/ABCGKOSVY1
impoppare/ABCGKOSVY1
improvvisare/ABCGKOSVY1
inacidire/ABCGKOSVY1
incadaverire/ABCGKOSVY1
incantucciare/ABCGKOSVY1
incarognire/ABCGKOSVY1
incattivare/ABCGKOSVY1
incerare/ABCGKOSVY1
incimurrire/ABCGKOSVY1
incominciare/ABCGKOSVY1
incretinire/ABCGKOSVY1
indebitare/ABCGKOSVY1
individuare/ABCGKOSVY1
infagottare/ABCGKOSVY1
infettare/ABCGKOSVY1
infiorettare/ABCGKOSVY1
inforestierire/ABCGKOSVY1
infrascare/ABCGKOSVY1
ingegnerizzare/ABCGKOSVY1
ingiungere/ABDGKOSVY1
ingrandire/ABCGKOSVY1
ingurgitare/ABCGKOSVY1
inoltrare/ABCGKOSVY1
insaporire/ABCGKOSVY1
insordire/ABCGKOSVY1
intaccare/ABCGKOSVY1
interagire/ABCGKOSVY1
internazionalizzare/ABCGKOSVY1
intimidire/ABCGKOSVY1
intrallazzare/ABCGKOSVY1
introvertere/ABCGKOSVY1
invalidare/ABCGKOSVY1
invigilare/ABCGKOSVY1
inzolfare/ABCGKOSVY1
irraggiare/ABCGKOSVY1
ispessire/ABCGKOSVY1
labializzare/ABCGKOSVY1
largheggiare/ABCGKOSVY1
legittimare/ABCGKOSVY1
licenziare/ABCGKOSVY1
localizzare/ABCGKOSVY1
lussureggiare/ABCGKOSVY1
malmenare/ABCGKOSVY1
mantecare/ABCGKOSVY1
matrizzare/ABCGKOSVY1
metallizzare/ABCGKOSVY1
missare/ABCGKOSVY1
monopolizzare/ABCGKOSVY1
mutuare/ABCGKOSVY1
nominalizzare/ABCGKOSVY1
oltraggiare/ABCGKOSVY1
orlare/ABCGKOSVY1
ovattare/ABCGKOSVY1
paracadutare/ABCGKOSVY1
pastificare/ABCGKOSVY1
pennelleggiare/ABCGKOSVY1
perturbare/ABCGKOSVY1
pilotare/ABCGKOSVY1
poetizzare/ABCGKOSVY1
posticipare/ABCGKOSVY1
potere/12ABDKOSVYZa
prefiorire/ABCGKOSVY1
prestampare/ABCGKOSVY1
programmare/ABCGKOSVY1
provare/ABCGKOSVY1
quantificare/ABCGKOSVY1
racimolare/ABCGKOSVY1
raggirare/ABCGKOSVY1
rammollire/ABCGKOSVY1
rassegnare/ABCGKOSVY1
recapitare/ABCGKOSVY1
reimpiegare/ABCGKOSVY1
resettare/ABCGKOSVY1
riaccasare/ABCGKOSVY1
rianimare/ABCGKOSVY1
ribadire/ABCGKOSVY1
ricevere/ABCGKOSVY1
ricostituire/ABCGKOSVY1
rielaborare/ABCGKOSVY1
rifrugare/ABCGKOSVY1
rimangiare/ABCGKOSVY1
rimpacchettare/ABCGKOSVY1
rincasare/ABCGKOSVY1
rinforzare/ABCGKOSVY1
rintoccare/ABCGKOSVY1
ripercorrere/ABDGKOSVY1
riscaldare/ABCGKOSVY1
risposare/ABCGKOSVY1
ritrasformare/ABCGKOSVY1
rollare/ABCGKOSVY1
saccheggiare/ABCGKOSVY1
santificare/ABCGKOSVY1
sbarrare/ABCGKOSVY1
sbottonare/ABCGKOSVY1
sbuzzare/ABCGKOSVY1
scampanellare/ABCGKOSVY1
scarriolare/ABCGKOSVY1
schermografare/ABCGKOSVY1
scioccare/ABCGKOSVY1
scompletare/ABCGKOSVY1
scorporare/ABCGKOSVY1
sculacciare/ABCGKOSVY1
sellare/ABCGKOSVY1
sfaldellare/ABCGKOSVY1
sfiorire/ABCGKOSVY1
sfuriare/ABCGKOSVY1
sgranellare/ABCGKOSVY1
simbolizzare/ABCGKOSVY1
smagrire/ABCGKOSVY1
smobilitare/ABCGKOSVY1
soffocare/ABCGKOSVY1
someggiare/ABCGKOSVY1
sopreccedere/ABCGKOSVY1
sottosterzare/ABCGKOSVY1
spadellare/ABCGKOSVY1
spaurire/ABCGKOSVY1
spesare/ABCGKOSVY1
spiluccare/ABCGKOSVY1
sporgere/ABDGKOSVY1
sputacchiare/ABCGKOSVY1
stagnare/ABCGKOSVY1
stentare/ABCGKOSVY1
storcere/ABCGKOSVY1
strapazzare/ABCGKOSVY1
strombare/ABCGKOSVY1
subissare/ABCGKOSVY1
supputare/ABCGKOSVY1
sverdire/ABCGKOSVY1
svolvere/ABCGKOSVY1
tarpare/ABCGKOSVY1
teletrasportare/ABCGKOSVY1
tesorizzare/ABCGKOSVY1
tonsurare/ABCGKOSVY1
trafiggere/ABDGKOSVY1
transumare/ABCGKOSVY1
trastullare/ABCGKOSVY1
trinciare/ABCGKOSVY1
tumultare/ABCGKOSVY1
uperizzare/ABCGKOSVY1
vangare/ABCGKOSVY1
versare/ABCGKOSVY1
vistare/ABCGKOSVY1
vorticare/ABCGKOSVY1
